Utah statutes.
58-37-7.5.   Controlled substance database -- Pharmacy reporting
requirements -- Access -- Penalties.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Board" means the Utah State Board of Pharmacy created in Section
58-17b-201.
(b)  "Database" means the controlled substance database created in this
section.
(c)  "Database manager" means the person responsible for operating the
database, or the person's designee.
(d)  "Division" means the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing
created in Section 58-1-103.
(e)  "Health care facility" is as defined in Section 26-21-2.
(f)  "Mental health therapist" is as defined in Section 58-60-102.
(g)  "Pharmacy" or "pharmaceutical facility" is as defined in Section
58-17b-102.
(h)  "Prospective patient" means a person who:
(i)  is seeking medical advice, medical treatment, or medical services from a
practitioner; and
(ii)  the practitioner described in Subsection (1)(h)(i) is considering
accepting as a patient.
(i)  "Substance abuse treatment program" is as defined in Section 62A-2-101.
(2) (a)  There is created within the division a controlled substance database.
(b)  The division shall administer and direct the functioning of the database
in accordance with this section.  The division may under state procurement
laws contract with another state agency or private entity to establish,
operate, or maintain the database.  The division in collaboration with the
board shall determine whether to operate the database within the division or
contract with another entity to operate the database, based on an analysis of
costs and benefits.
(c)  The purpose of the database is to contain data as described in this
section regarding every prescription for a controlled substance dispensed in
the state to any person other than an inpatient in a licensed health care
facility.
(d)  Data required by this section shall be submitted in compliance with this
section to the manager of the database by the pharmacist in charge of the drug
outlet where the controlled substance is dispensed.
(3)  The board shall advise the division regarding:
(a)  establishing, maintaining, and operating the database;
(b)  access to the database and how access is obtained; and
(c)  control of information contained in the database.
(4)  The pharmacist in charge shall, regarding each controlled substance
dispensed by a pharmacist under the pharmacist's supervision other than those
dispensed for an inpatient at a health care facility, submit to the manager of
the database the following information, by a procedure and in a format
established by the division:
(a)  name of the prescribing practitioner;
(b)  date of the prescription;
(c)  date the prescription was filled;
(d)  name of the person for whom the prescription was written;
(e)  positive identification of the person receiving the prescription,
including the type of identification and any identifying numbers on the
identification;
(f)  name of the controlled substance;
(g)  quantity of controlled substance prescribed;
(h)  strength of controlled substance;
(i)  quantity of controlled substance dispensed;
(j)  dosage quantity and frequency as prescribed;
(k)  name of drug outlet dispensing the controlled substance;
(l)  name of pharmacist dispensing the controlled substance; and
(m)  other relevant information as required by division rule.
(5)  The division shall maintain the database in an electronic file or by
other means established by the division to facilitate use of the database for
identification of:
(a)  prescribing practices and patterns of prescribing and dispensing
controlled substances;
(b)  practitioners prescribing controlled substances in an unprofessional or
unlawful manner;
(c)  individuals receiving prescriptions for controlled substances from
licensed practitioners, and who subsequently obtain dispensed controlled
substances from a drug outlet in quantities or with a frequency inconsistent
with generally recognized standards of dosage for that controlled substance;
and
(d)  individuals presenting forged or otherwise false or altered prescriptions
for controlled substances to a pharmacy.
(6) (a)  The division shall by rule establish the electronic format in which
the information required under this section shall be submitted to the
administrator of the database.
(b)  The division shall ensure the database system records and maintains for
reference:
(i)  identification of each person who requests or receives information from
the database;
(ii)  the information provided to each person; and
(iii)  the date and time the information is requested or provided.
(7)  The division shall make rules to:
(a)  effectively enforce the limitations on access to the database as
described in Subsection (8); and
(b)  establish standards and procedures to ensure accurate identification of
individuals requesting information or receiving information without request
from the database.
(8)  The manager of the database shall make information in the database
available only to the following persons, in accordance with the requirements
of this section and division rules:
(a)  personnel of the division specifically assigned to conduct investigations
related to controlled substances laws under the jurisdiction of the division;
(b)  authorized division personnel engaged in analysis of controlled substance
prescription information as a part of the assigned duties and responsibilities
of their employment;
(c)  employees of the Department of Health whom the director of the Department
of Health assigns to conduct scientific studies regarding the use or abuse of
controlled substances, provided that the identity of the individuals and
pharmacies in the database are confidential and are not disclosed in any
manner to any individual who is not directly involved in the scientific
studies;
(d)  a licensed practitioner having authority to prescribe controlled
substances, to the extent the information:
(i) (A)  relates specifically to a current or prospective patient of the
practitioner; and
(B)  is sought by the practitioner for the purpose of:
(I)  prescribing or considering prescribing any controlled substance to the
current or prospective patient;
(II)  diagnosing the current or prospective patient;
(III)  providing medical treatment or medical advice to the current or
prospective patient; or
(IV)  determining whether the current or prospective patient:
(Aa)  is attempting to fraudulently obtain a controlled substance from the
practitioner; or
(Bb)  has fraudulently obtained, or attempted to fraudulently obtain, a
controlled substance from the practitioner;
(ii) (A)  relates specifically to a former patient of the practitioner; and
(B)  is sought by the practitioner for the purpose of determining whether the
former patient has fraudulently obtained, or has attempted to fraudulently
obtain, a controlled substance from the practitioner;
(iii)  relates specifically to an individual who has access to the
practitioner's Drug Enforcement Administration number, and the practitioner
suspects that the individual may have used the practitioner's Drug Enforcement
Administration identification number to fraudulently acquire or prescribe a
controlled substance;
(iv)  relates to the practitioner's own prescribing practices, except when
specifically prohibited by the division by administrative rule;
(v)  relates to the use of the controlled substance database by an employee of
the practitioner, described in Subsection (8)(e); or
(vi)  relates to any use of the practitioner's Drug Enforcement Administration
identification number to obtain, attempt to obtain, prescribe, or attempt to
prescribe, a controlled substance;
(e)  in accordance with Subsection (17), an employee of a practitioner
described in Subsection (8)(d), for a purpose described in Subsection
(8)(d)(i) or (ii), if:
(i)  the employee is designated by the practitioner as a person authorized to
access the information on behalf of the practitioner;
(ii)  the practitioner provides written notice to the division of the identity
of the employee; and
(iii)  the division:
(A)  grants the employee access to the database; and
(B)  provides the employee with a password that is unique to that employee to
access the database in order to permit the division to comply with the
requirements of Subsection (6)(b) with respect to the employee;
(f)  a licensed pharmacist having authority to dispense controlled substances
to the extent the information is sought for the purpose of:
(i)  dispensing or considering dispensing any controlled substance; or
(ii)  determining whether a person:
(A)  is attempting to fraudulently obtain a controlled substance from the
pharmacist; or
(B)  has fraudulently obtained, or attempted to fraudulently obtain, a
controlled substance from the pharmacist;
(g)  federal, state, and local law enforcement authorities, and state and
local prosecutors, engaged as a specified duty of their employment in
enforcing laws:
(i)  regulating controlled substances; or
(ii)  investigating insurance fraud, Medicaid fraud, or Medicare fraud;
(h)  a mental health therapist, if:
(i)  the information relates to a patient who is:
(A)  enrolled in a licensed substance abuse treatment program; and
(B)  receiving treatment from, or under the direction of, the mental health
therapist as part of the patient's participation in the licensed substance
abuse treatment program described in Subsection (8)(h)(i)(A);
(ii)  the information is sought for the purpose of determining whether the
patient is using a controlled substance while the patient is enrolled in the
licensed substance abuse treatment program described in Subsection
(8)(h)(i)(A); and
(iii)  the licensed substance abuse treatment program described in Subsection
(8)(h)(i)(A) is associated with a practitioner who:
(A)  is a physician, a physician assistant, an advance practice registered
nurse, or a pharmacist; and
(B)  is available to consult with the mental health therapist regarding the
information obtained by the mental health therapist, under this Subsection
(8)(h), from the database; and
(i)  an individual who is the recipient of a controlled substance prescription
entered into the database, upon providing evidence satisfactory to the
database manager that the individual requesting the information is in fact the
person about whom the data entry was made.
(9)  Any person who knowingly and intentionally releases any information in
the database in violation of the limitations under Subsection (8) is guilty of
a third degree felony.
(10) (a)  Any person who obtains or attempts to obtain information from the
database by misrepresentation or fraud is guilty of a third degree felony.
(b)  Any person who obtains or attempts to obtain information from the
database for a purpose other than a purpose authorized by this section or by
rule is guilty of a third degree felony.
(11) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (11)(d), a person may not knowingly
and intentionally use, release, publish, or otherwise make available to any
other person or entity any information obtained from the database for any
purpose other than those specified in Subsection (8).  Each separate violation
of this Subsection (11) is a third degree felony and is also subject to a
civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(b)  The procedure for determining a civil violation of this Subsection (11)
shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-108, regarding adjudicative
proceedings within the division.
(c)  Civil penalties assessed under this Subsection (11) shall be deposited in
the General Fund as a dedicated credit to be used by the division under
Subsection 58-37-7.7(1).
(d)  Nothing in this Subsection (11) prohibits a person who obtains
information from the database under Subsection (8)(d) or (e) from:
(i)  including the information in the person's medical chart or file for
access by a person authorized to review the medical chart or file; or
(ii)  providing the information to a person in accordance with the
requirements of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996.
(12) (a)  The failure of a pharmacist in charge to submit information to the
database as required under this section after the division has submitted a
specific written request for the information or when the division determines
the individual has a demonstrable pattern of failing to submit the information
as required is grounds for the division to take the following actions in
accordance with Section 58-1-401:
(i)  refuse to issue a license to the individual;
(ii)  refuse to renew the individual's license;
(iii)  revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license;
(iv)  issue a public or private reprimand to the individual;
(v)  issue a cease and desist order; and
(vi)  impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each dispensed
prescription regarding which the required information is not submitted.
(b)  Civil penalties assessed under Subsection (12)(a)(vi) shall be deposited
in the General Fund as a dedicated credit to be used by the division under
Subsection 58-37-7.7(1).
(c)  The procedure for determining a civil violation of this Subsection (12)
shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-108, regarding adjudicative
proceedings within the division.
(13)  An individual who has submitted information to the database in
accordance with this section may not be held civilly liable for having
submitted the information.
(14)  All department and the division costs necessary to establish and operate
the database shall be funded by appropriations from:
(a)  the Commerce Service Fund; and
(b)  the General Fund.
(15)  All costs associated with recording and submitting data as required in
this section shall be assumed by the submitting pharmacy.
(16) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (16)(b), data provided to,
maintained in, or accessed from the database that may be identified to, or
with, a particular person is not subject to discovery, subpoena, or similar
compulsory process in any civil, judicial, administrative, or legislative
proceeding, nor shall any individual or organization with lawful access to the
data be compelled to testify with regard to the data.
(b)  The restrictions in Subsection (16)(a) do not apply to:
(i)  a criminal proceeding; or
(ii)  a civil, judicial, or administrative action brought to enforce the
provisions of this section, Section 58-37-7.7, or Section 58-37-7.8.
(17) (a)  A practitioner described in Subsection (8)(d) may designate up to
three employees to access information from the database under Subsection
(8)(e).
(b)  The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish background check procedures
to determine whether an employee designated under Subsection (8)(e)(i) should
be granted access to the database.
(c)  The division shall grant an employee designated under Subsection
(8)(e)(i) access to the database, unless the division determines, based on a
background check, that the employee poses a security risk to the information
contained in the database.
(d)  The division may impose a fee, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, on a
practitioner who designates an employee under Subsection (8)(e)(i), to pay for
the costs incurred by the division to conduct the background check and make
the determination described in Subsection (17)(c).
(18) (a)  A person who is granted access to the database based on the fact
that the person is a licensed practitioner or a mental health therapist shall
be denied access to the database when the person is no longer licensed.
(b)  A person who is granted access to the database based on the fact that the
person is a designated employee of a licensed practitioner shall be denied
access to the database when the practitioner is no longer licensed.
(19)  A person who is a relative of a deceased individual is not entitled to
access information from the database relating to the deceased individual based
on the fact or claim that the person is:
(a)  related to the deceased individual; or
(b)  subrogated to the rights of the deceased individual.
